Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1099.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 12, chapter 6, article 6, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 12-651.01, to read: START_STATUTE12-651.01. Defamation; statute of limitations; definitions A. A person commits defamation if the plaintiff is a private figure, the matter is of private concern and the plaintiff shows all of the following exist: 1. The person publishes a statement that is: (a) Provable as false. (b) Reasonably perceived as stating actual facts about the plaintiff rather than imaginative expression or rhetorical hyperbole. 2. The person makes the statement with knowledge of its falsity, acts with reckless disregard of the statement's falsity or negligently fails to ascertain the statement's falsity. 3. The statement, when examined within the full context in which it was made, injures the plaintiff's reputation by doing any of the following: (a) Identifying the plaintiff by name. (b) Including a description of or reference to the plaintiff so that those who hear or read the statement reasonably understand the plaintiff to be the subject of the statement. (c) Implying a clearly defamatory meaning that, when examined within its context, causes the average person to PERCEIVE a defamatory message. B. A person commits defamation if the plaintiff is a private figure, the matter is of public concern and the plaintiff shows all of the following exist: 1. The person publishes a statement that the person knows to be false, acts with reckless disregard of the statement's falsity or negligently fails to ascertain the statement's falsity. 2. The person publishes a statement that, when examined within the full context in which it was made, injures the plaintiff's reputation by doing any of the following: (a) Identifying the plaintiff by name. (b) Including a description of or reference to the plaintiff so that those who hear or read the statement reasonably understand the plaintiff to be the subject of the statement. (c) Implying a clearly defamatory meaning that, when examined within its context, causes the average person to PERCEIVE a defamatory message. 3. The published statement is both: (a) Provable as false. (b) Reasonably perceived as stating actual facts about the plaintiff rather than imaginative expression or rhetorical hyperbole. C. A person commits defamation if the plaintiff is a public figure, the matter is of public concern and the plaintiff shows all of the following exist: 1. The person publishes a statement that the person knows to be false or acts with reckless disregard of the statement's truth. 2. The person publishes a statement that, when examined within the full context in which it was made, injures the plaintiff's reputation by: (a) Identifying the plaintiff by name. (b) Including a description of or reference to the plaintiff so that those who hear or read the STATEMENT reasonably understand the plaintiff to be the subject of the statement. (c) Implying a clearly defamatory meaning that, when examined within its context, causes the average person to PERCEIVE a defamatory message. 3. The statement is both: (a) Provable as false. (b) Reasonably perceived as stating actual facts about the plaintiff rather than imaginative expression or rhetorical hyperbole. D. A defamation action under this section involving a defamatory statement that is published on the internet shall be commenced within one year from the date the person removes the defamatory statement from the internet site or internet-based platform where the person originally published the defamatory statement.  A statement that is published on the internet is considered republished each day that the statement remains on the internet. E. FOr the purposes of this subsection: 1. "internet" has the same meaning prescribed in section 18-501. 2. "Internet-based platform" includes: (a) A digital service that facilitates user interaction, content creation or information exchange. (b) A social media service. (c) A content sharing service. (d) A cloud based service.END_STATUTE